Utah statutes.
13-10b-201.   Unlawful recording of a motion picture -- Penalties.
(1)  It is unlawful for any individual to knowingly operate the audiovisual
recording function of any camcorder or similar device in a motion picture
theater:
(a)  while a motion picture is being exhibited; and
(b)  without the consent of the motion picture theater owner or operator.
(2) (a)  A violation of this section is a class A misdemeanor.
(b)  A second or subsequent violation of this section is a third degree
felony.
